Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4908
Board, defined.

Board means the Governor, the State Treasurer, and the chairperson of the Nebraska Investment Council.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 8.

Nebraska Investment Council, see section 72-1237.